Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Company" means a publicly traded for-profit corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other
business entity that is doing business in this state as defined in KRS 141.010(13);
(2) "Company proposal" means a proposal made by a company that is included in the company's proxy
statement, including a proposal regarding director nominations or elections, executive compensation,
corporate transactions and structure, auditor selection, or similar measures;
(3) "Default recommendation or policy" means a system, set of rules, principles, or guidelines designed to
assist with voting decisions on any company proposal or proxy proposal;
(4) "Economic analysis" means a written analysis of the economic impact of a shareholder-sponsored
proposal, which shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The subject matter of the shareholder-sponsored proposal;
(b) Whether the board of directors of the issuer of securities opposes the shareholder-sponsored proposal
and the stated reasons for the opposition;
(c) Whether the shareholder-sponsored proposal is consistent with the investment policy of the
shareholder receiving the advice;
(d) The economic benefits and costs of implementing the shareholder-sponsored proposal, as written, in
the long and short term;
(e) The quantifiable impact of the shareholder-sponsored proposal, as written, on the investment returns
of the shareholder receiving the advice; and
(f) An explanation of the modeling, procedures, and processes used to complete the economic analysis;
(5) A "material connection" is established if there is a substantial likelihood that a reasonable investor would
consider it important in determining the financial risk or the financial return of an investment;
(6) "Materially different advice," with respect to advice or a recommendation on how to vote on a company
proposal or shareholder-sponsored proposal, means simultaneously advising or recommending that one (1)
or more clients vote for:
(a) The proposal and one (1) or more clients vote against the proposal;
(b) A nominee for a company's governing authority and one (1) or more clients vote against or abstain
from voting for the same nominee; or
(c) Or against the proposal in opposition to the recommendation of the company's management;
(7) "Nonpecuniary interest" includes but is not limited to an environmental, social, political, or ideological
interest which does not have a direct and material connection to the financial risk or financial return of an
investment;
(8) "Pecuniary factor" means a consideration having a direct and material connection to the financial risk or
financial return of an investment;
(9) "Proxy advisor":
(a) Means any person who is engaged in the business of providing advice, research, analysis, ratings, or
recommendations specifically with respect to proxy voting for compensation; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Does not include an "investment advisor" under the federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15
U.S.C. sec. 80b-2, except when engaged in the business of providing proxy advisory service to a third
party for compensation;
(10) "Proxy advisory service" means any of the following services that are provided in connection with or in
relation to a company:
(a) Advice or recommendations on how to vote on a shareholder-sponsored proposal or company
proposal;
(b) Proxy statement research and analysis regarding a shareholder-sponsored proposal or company
proposal;
(c) A rating or research regarding corporate governance; or
(d) Development of proxy voting recommendations or policies, including establishing default
recommendations or policies;
(11) "Shareholder" includes a shareholder, unitholder, limited partner, or other equity owner of a company;
(12) "Shareholder-sponsored proposal" means a proposal by a shareholder included in the proxy statement of
an issuer of securities pursuant to 17 C.F.R. sec. 240.14a-8; and
(13) "Solely in the interest of shareholders" shall be determined using only pecuniary factors and shall not
include any purpose to further a nonpecuniary interest.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A proxy advisory service is not solely in the interest of shareholders of a company if the service:
(a) Is wholly or partly based on, or otherwise takes into account, one (1) or more nonpecuniary interests
or subordinates the financial interests of shareholders to other objectives, including sacrificing
investment returns or undertaking additional investment risk to promote or further nonpecuniary
interests;
(b) Involves providing a voting recommendation with respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal that:
1. Is inconsistent with the voting recommendation of the company's board of directors or a board
committee composed of a majority of the company's independent directors; and
2. Does not include a written economic analysis of the financial impact on shareholders of the
proposal; or
(c) Advises against a company proposal to elect a governing person unless the proxy advisor
affirmatively states that the proxy advisory service rendered such advice solely in the interest of the
shareholders of the company.
(2) If a proxy advisor provides a proxy advisory service that is not solely in the interest of shareholders as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, the proxy advisor shall:
(a) Include, in writing or by electronic means, a disclosure to each shareholder or entity or other person
acting on behalf of a shareholder receiving the proxy advisory service that:
1. Conspicuously states that pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the proxy advisory service
is not being provided solely in the interest of shareholders and that the advice subordinates the
financial interests of shareholders to other objectives, including sacrificing investment returns
or undertaking additional investment risk to promote one (1) or more nonpecuniary interests;
and
2. Explains, with particularity, the basis of the proxy advisor's advice concerning each
recommendation, including but not limited to the company or companies for which the advice
applies to and the nonpecuniary interests used in the basis of the advice; and
(b) Immediately provide a copy of the disclosure required under paragraph (a) of this subsection to the
company that is subject to the proxy advisory service.
(3) If the proxy advisor provides materially different advice to different clients who have not expressly
requested proxy advisory services for a nonpecuniary interest, the advisor shall:
(a) If applicable, comply with the disclosure requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and

CHAPTER 10 3
(b) Notify, in writing or by electronic means, each shareholder or entity or other person acting on behalf
of a shareholder receiving the proxy advisory service, the company that is subject to the materially
different advice provided by the proxy advisory service, and the Attorney General, of the materially
different advice and disclose the advice or recommendation that is:
1. Provided solely in the interest of shareholders; and
2. Supported by an economic analysis performed and relied upon by the proxy advisor.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Failure to comply with the notification and disclosure requirements established for proxy advisors in
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall be deemed to be an unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice
in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of KRS 367.170.
(2) The recipient of proxy advisory services provided by a proxy advisor, the company that is the subject of the
proxy advisory services, or any shareholder of the company that is the subject of the proxy advisory services
may bring a cause of action seeking declaratory or injunctive relief in the Circuit Court of the county where
the plaintiff resides or where the violation occurred.
(3) (a) In any proceeding under subsection (2) of this section, the plaintiff shall serve the Attorney General
with a copy of the petition within seven (7) days of filing. The Attorney General may intervene in the
action.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General under KRS 367.110 to
367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS 367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared
unlawful by KRS 367.170, shall apply with equal force and effect to a violation of Section 1 or 2 of
this Act.
(c) Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties, remedies, or
penalties available to the Attorney General under any other statutory or common law.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 1 to 3 of this Act to the contrary, a cause of action
under Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall not be brought against a nonprofit organization exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c) by any person or entity other than the Attorney General of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky:
1. Provided that the nonprofit organization has gross annual revenue attributable to proxy
advisory services of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and
2. Provided further that in the event the nonprofit organization is a member of an affiliated
group, the combined gross annual revenue of all members of the affiliated group attributable
to proxy advisory services is less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(b) This subsection shall not limit the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or enforce
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act against any person or entity.
Section 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this Act apply to proxy advisory services provided on or after the effective
date of this Act.
Veto Overridden March 31, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version